Utah statutes.
16-17-301.   Service of process on entities.
(1)  A registered agent is an agent of the represented entity authorized to
receive service of any process, notice, or demand required or permitted by law
to be served on the entity.
(2)  If an entity that previously filed a registered agent filing with the
division no longer has a registered agent, or if its registered agent cannot
with reasonable diligence be served, the entity may be served by registered or
certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the governors of the
entity by name at its principal office in accordance with any applicable
judicial rules and procedures.  The names of the governors and the address of
the principal office may be as shown in the most recent annual report filed
with the division.  Service is perfected under this Subsection (2) at the
earliest of:
(a)  the date the entity receives the mail;
(b)  the date shown on the return receipt, if signed on behalf of the entity;
or
(c)  five days after its deposit with the United States Postal Service, if
correctly addressed and with sufficient postage.
(3)  If process, notice, or demand cannot be served on an entity pursuant to
Subsection (1) or (2), service of process may be made by handing a copy to the
manager, clerk, or other person in charge of any regular place of business or
activity of the entity if the person served is not a plaintiff in the action.
(4)  Service of process, notice, or demand on a registered agent shall be in
the form of a written document, except that service may be made on a
commercial registered agent in such other forms of a record, and subject to
such requirements as the agent has stated from time to time in its listing
under Section 16-17-204 that it will accept.
(5)  Service of process, notice, or demand may be perfected by any other means
prescribed by law other than this chapter.
